Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1833
Committee; report; powers and duties.

(1)
The committee shall prepare and submit to the commission a biennial report
of its activities under the Nebraska Crime Victim's Reparations Act. Such
report shall be submitted to the Governor and Clerk of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of
the Legislature shall be submitted electronically.

(2) The committee shall act as the oversight committee for
the Community Trust and shall annually report its activities and findings
as the oversight committee to the commission, the Governor, and the Clerk
of the Legislature. The report submitted to the Clerk of the Legislature shall
be submitted electronically. If any questionable or improper actions or inactions
on the part of the Community Trust are observed, the committee shall immediately
notify the Attorney General who shall investigate the matter.

Laws 1978, LB 910, § 33;

Laws 1979, LB 322, § 60;

Laws 1980, LB 319, § 6;

Laws 1981, LB 545, § 37;

Laws 1981, LB 328, § 8;

Laws 1986, LB 540, § 31;

Laws 2009, LB598, § 12;

Laws 2012, LB782, § 208;

Laws 2013, LB99, § 7.